apertium-oss.oss.dix
    <pardef n="Википед/и__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийы</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийӕн</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийы</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийыл</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийау</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ты</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тӕн</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тмӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тӕй</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ты</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тыл</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тау</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тимӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Verbs -->

    <e lm="Википеди"><i>Википед</i><par n="Википед/и__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Викимеди"><i>Викимед</i><par n="Википед/и__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Фонд Викимеди"><i>Фонд<b/>Викимед</i><par n="Википед/и__np"/></e>
